Utah statutes.
9-7-406.   Reports to governing body and State Library Board.
The library board of directors shall:
(1)  make an annual report to the city governing body on the condition and
operation of the library, including a financial statement; and
(2)  provide for the keeping of records required by the State Library Board in
its request for an annual report from the public libraries, and submit that
annual report to the State Library Board.
